Hawaii statutes.
§11-335 Noncandidate committee reports. (a)
The authorized person in the case of a party, or treasurer in the case of a
noncandidate committee that is not a party, shall file preliminary, final, and
supplemental reports that disclose the following information:

(1) The noncandidate committee's name and address;

(2) The cash on hand at the beginning of the
reporting period and election period;

(3) The reporting period and election period
aggregate totals for each of the following categories:

(A) Contributions received;

(B) Contributions made;

(C) Expenditures; and

(D) Other receipts;

(4) The cash on hand at the end of the reporting
period; and

(5) The surplus or deficit at the end of the
reporting period.

(b) Schedules filed with the reports shall
include the following additional information:

(1) The amount and date of deposit of each
contribution received and the name, address, occupation, and employer of each
contributor making a contribution aggregating more than $100 during an election
period, which was not previously reported; provided that if:

(A) All the information is not on file, the
contribution shall be returned to the contributor within thirty days of
deposit; and

(B) A noncandidate committee making only
independent expenditures receives a contribution of more than $10,000 in the
aggregate in an election period from an entity other than an individual,
for-profit business entity, or labor union, then the schedule shall include:

(i) The internet address where the
contributing entity's disclosure report can be publicly accessed, if the
contributing entity is subject to state or federal disclosure reporting
requirements regarding the source of the contributing entity's funds;

(ii) The name, address, occupation, and
employer of each funding source that contributed $100 or more in the aggregate
in an election period to that contributing entity; or

(iii) An acknowledgment that the contributing
entity is not subject to any state or federal disclosure reporting requirements
regarding the source of the contributing entity's funds;

(2) The amount and date of each contribution made and
the name and address of the candidate, candidate committee, or noncandidate
committee to which the contribution was made;

(3) All expenditures, including the name and address
of each payee and the amount, date, and purpose of each expenditure; provided
that:

(A) Expenditures for advertisements or
electioneering communications shall include the names of the candidates
supported, opposed, or clearly identified;

(B) Expenditures for consultants, advertising
agencies and similar firms, credit card payments, salaries, and candidate
reimbursements shall be itemized to permit a reasonable person to determine the
ultimate intended recipient of the expenditure and its purpose;

(C) Independent expenditures shall include
the name of any candidate supported, opposed, or clearly identified; and

(D) The purpose of an independent expenditure
shall include the name of the candidate who is supported or opposed by the
expenditure, and whether the expenditure supports or opposes the candidate;

(4) For noncandidate committees making only
independent expenditures, certification that no expenditures have been
coordinated with a candidate, candidate committee, or any agent of a candidate
or candidate committee;

(5) The amount, date of deposit, and description of
other receipts and the name and address of the source of each of the other
receipts;

(6) A description of each durable asset, the date of
acquisition, value at the time of acquisition, and the name and address of the
vendor or contributor of the asset; and

(7) The date of disposition of a durable asset, value
at the time of disposition, method of disposition, and name and address of the
person receiving the asset.

(c) No loan may be made or received by a
noncandidate committee.

(d) The authorized person in the case of a
party, or treasurer in the case of a noncandidate committee that is not a
party, shall file a late contribution report as provided in section 11-338 if
the committee receives late contributions from any person aggregating more than
$500 or makes late contributions aggregating more than $500.

(e) For purposes of this section,
"electioneering communication" means the same as defined in section
11-341. [L 2010, c 211, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 111, §1 and c 112, §5; am L
2015, c 209, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next